Alabama, session 2026rs, HB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION or CTE. An area of
study that blends academic, occupational, and life skills
leading to a credential, employment, or further education.
(2) HOME SCHOOL STUDENT. A student who is instructed by
a private tutor pursuant to Section 16-28-5, Code of Alabama
1975, or who is taught at home and is enrolled in a private
school or a church school as defined in Section 16-28-1, Code
of Alabama 1975.
(3) STATE BOARD. The State Board of Education.
(b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a home
school student may participate in any career and technical
education program offered by a public school, provided that:
(1) The home school student enrolls as a nontraditional
public school student; and
(2) The home school student pays any course fees in an
amount equal to the fee charged to an enrolled public school
Page 2

amount equal to the fee charged to an enrolled public school
HB183 INTRODUCED
student.
(c) In the event that a CTE program has limited
enrollment capacity, a home school student who wishes to
enroll in the CTE program shall be considered for enrollment
after current public school students are enrolled.
(d)(1) The state board shall adopt rules to implement
and administer this section.
(2) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy
reflecting the requirements of this section and rules adopted
by the state board.
(e) This section does not require any full-time,
stand-alone career and technical education school to allow
home school students to participate in its career and
technical education programs. However, any full-time,
stand-alone career and technical education school may choose
to allow home school students to participate in its career and
technical education programs pursuant to this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3